Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.01, subdivision 15, is amended to read: Subd. 15. Pharmacist internnew text begin or internnew text end . "Pharmacist intern" new text begin or "intern" new text end meansnew text begin :new text end (1) a natural person new text begin who has completed college or school of pharmacy orientation or is otherwise enrolled in a doctor of pharmacy program accredited by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education (ACPE) and is new text end satisfactorily progressing toward the degree in pharmacy required for licensuredeleted text begin , ordeleted text end new text begin ;new text end (2) a graduate of deleted text begin the University of Minnesota College of Pharmacy, or other pharmacy college approved by the board,deleted text end new text begin a doctor of pharmacy program accredited by ACPEnew text end who is registered by the Board of Pharmacy for the purpose of obtaining practical experience as a requirement for licensure as a pharmacistdeleted text begin , ordeleted text end new text begin ;new text end (3) a qualified applicant awaiting examination for licensuredeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (4) a participant in a residency or fellowship program who is not licensed to practice pharmacy in Minnesota but is: new text end new text begin (i) licensed to practice pharmacy in another state; or new text end new text begin (ii) a graduate of a doctor of pharmacy program accredited by ACPE and not registered by the board under clause (2); or new text end new text begin (5) a foreign pharmacy graduate who: new text end new text begin (i) has passed the Foreign Pharmacy Graduate Equivalency Examination; new text end new text begin (ii) is certified by the Foreign Pharmacy Graduate Equivalency Commission; and new text end new text begin (iii) is seeking internship experience in accordance with Minnesota Rules, part 6800.1250. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.065, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Application fees. Application fees for licensure and registration are as follows: (1) pharmacist licensed by examination, $225; (2) pharmacist licensed by reciprocity, $300; (3) pharmacy intern, deleted text begin $75deleted text end new text begin $25new text end ; (4) pharmacy technician, $60; (5) pharmacy, $450; (6) drug wholesaler, legend drugs only, $5,500; (7) drug wholesaler, legend and nonlegend drugs, $5,500; (8) drug wholesaler, nonlegend drugs, veterinary legend drugs, or both, $5,500; (9) drug wholesaler, medical gases, $5,500 for the first facility and $500 for each additional facility; (10) third-party logistics provider, $300; (11) drug manufacturer, nonopiate legend drugs only, $5,500; (12) drug manufacturer, nonopiate legend and nonlegend drugs, $5,500; (13) drug manufacturer, nonlegend or veterinary legend drugs, $5,500; (14) drug manufacturer, medical gases, $5,500 for the first facility and $500 for each additional facility; (15) drug manufacturer, also licensed as a pharmacy in Minnesota, $5,500; (16) drug manufacturer of opiate-containing controlled substances listed in section 152.02, subdivisions 3 to 5, $55,500; (17) medical gas dispenser, $400; (18) controlled substance researcher, $150; and (19) pharmacy professional corporation, $150. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.065, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Annual renewal fees. Annual licensure and registration renewal fees are as follows: (1) pharmacist, $225; (2) pharmacy technician, $60; new text begin (3) beginning January 1, 2026, pharmacy intern, $25; new text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end pharmacy, $450; deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end drug wholesaler, legend drugs only, $5,500; deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end drug wholesaler, legend and nonlegend drugs, $5,500; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end drug wholesaler, nonlegend drugs, veterinary legend drugs, or both, $5,500; deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end drug wholesaler, medical gases, $5,500 for the first facility and $500 for each additional facility; deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end third-party logistics provider, $300; deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end drug manufacturer, nonopiate legend drugs only, $5,500; deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end drug manufacturer, nonopiate legend and nonlegend drugs, $5,500; deleted text begin (11)deleted text end new text begin (12)new text end drug manufacturer, nonlegend, veterinary legend drugs, or both, $5,500; deleted text begin (12)deleted text end new text begin (13)new text end drug manufacturer, medical gases, $5,500 for the first facility and $500 for each additional facility; deleted text begin (13)deleted text end new text begin (14)new text end drug manufacturer, also licensed as a pharmacy in Minnesota, $5,500; deleted text begin (14)deleted text end new text begin (15)new text end drug manufacturer of opiate-containing controlled substances listed in section 152.02, subdivisions 3 to 5, $55,500; deleted text begin (15)deleted text end new text begin (16)new text end medical gas dispenser, $400; deleted text begin (16)deleted text end new text begin (17)new text end controlled substance researcher, $150; and deleted text begin (17)deleted text end new text begin (18)new text end pharmacy professional corporation, $150. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.065, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Reinstatement fees. (a) A pharmacist who has allowed the pharmacist's license to lapse may reinstate the license with board approval and upon payment of any fees and late fees in arrears, up to a maximum of $1,000. (b) A pharmacy technician who has allowed the technician's registration to lapse may reinstate the registration with board approval and upon payment of any fees and late fees in arrears, up to a maximum of $250. new text begin (c) A pharmacy intern who has allowed the intern's registration to lapse may reinstate the registration with board approval and upon payment of any fees and late fees in arrears, up to a maximum of $100. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end An owner of a pharmacy, a drug wholesaler, a drug manufacturer, third-party logistics provider, or a medical gas dispenser who has allowed the license of the establishment to lapse may reinstate the license with board approval and upon payment of any fees and late fees in arrears. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end A controlled substance researcher who has allowed the researcher's registration to lapse may reinstate the registration with board approval and upon payment of any fees and late fees in arrears. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end A pharmacist owner of a professional corporation who has allowed the corporation's registration to lapse may reinstate the registration with board approval and upon payment of any fees and late fees in arrears. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.101, is amended to read: 151.101 INTERNSHIP. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Registration requirements. new text end new text begin (a) new text end Upon payment of the fee specified in section 151.065, the board may register as an intern any natural persons who have satisfied the board that they are of good moral character, not physically or mentally unfit, and who have successfully completed the educational requirements for intern registration prescribed by the board. deleted text begin The board shall prescribe standards and requirements for interns, pharmacist-preceptors, and internship training but may not require more than one year of such training.deleted text end new text begin (b) new text end The board in its discretion may accept internship experience obtained in another state provided the internship requirements in such other state are in the opinion of the board equivalent to those herein provided. new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Renewal requirements. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning January 1, 2026, an intern registration expires on September 30 each year or when the intern receives a pharmacist license, whichever is earlier. new text end new text begin (b) To renew an intern registration, the intern must file an application for renewal and submit the fee established under section 151.065 on or before September 1 each year. new text end new text begin (c) If the board does not receive the intern's registration renewal application on or before September 1 each year, the intern is subject to a late filing fee equal to 50 percent of the renewal fee under section 151.065 in addition to the renewal fee. new text end new text begin (d) An individual who received an intern registration under the criteria in section 151.01, subdivision 15, clause (1), and paid $75 for the individual's application fee between May 1, 2024, and June 30, 2025, is not subject to the $25 renewal fee for the first two renewal cycles following the $75 fee payment. new text end new text begin (e) If an individual is no longer enrolled in a doctor of pharmacy program accredited by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education, the board must terminate that individual's intern registration effective the last date the individual was enrolled in a qualifying program. new text end new text begin (f) The board must not renew an intern registration unless the individual: new text end new text begin (1) has maintained current notices of employment for internship training with the board; new text end new text begin (2) submitted a progress report affidavit of the intern credit hours completed by June 15 each year; new text end new text begin (3) meets all other eligibility criteria for a pharmacist intern; and new text end new text begin (4) demonstrates to the board's satisfaction the individual is in good faith and with reasonable diligence pursuing a degree in pharmacy or is completing a pharmacy residency or fellowship. new text end new text begin (g) An intern whose registration has lapsed may renew the intern registration within one year of expiration, subject to the fees in paragraph (c). An intern whose registration has lapsed for more than one year must meet the registration requirements for an initial intern applicant in effect at the time the individual applies for reinstatement and pay any fees and late fees in arrears in accordance with section 151.065. new text end new text begin (h) If the board receives a late renewal, reinstatement, or initial intern application from an eligible individual within 90 days before September 30, the board may extend the registration expiration date for that applicant to September 30 of the subsequent calendar year and prorate the application fee accordingly. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Internship credit hour requirements. new text end new text begin (a) To apply for licensure as a pharmacist under section 151.10, an individual must complete at least 1,600 intern credit hours under the direction and supervision of a preceptor. new text end new text begin (b) Of the 1,600 credit hours required under this subdivision, an intern may earn: new text end new text begin (1) a maximum of 80 credit hours in the individual's first professional academic year for a structured experience directed by the college of pharmacy that the individual attends and is overseen by college faculty, registered preceptors, or supervising licensed pharmacists; new text end new text begin (2) a maximum of 400 credit hours of concurrent time internship; and new text end new text begin (3) a maximum of 54 credit hours per week that may be earned from more than one site. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Rules, parts 6800.5100, subpart 5; and 6800.5400, subparts 5 and 6, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Rule: 25-05058 6800.5100 DEFINITIONS. § Subp. 5. Pharmacist-intern; intern. "Pharmacist-intern" and "intern" mean: § A. a natural person satisfactorily progressing toward the degree in pharmacy required for licensure; § B. a graduate of the University of Minnesota College of Pharmacy, or other pharmacy college approved by the board, who is registered by the Board of Pharmacy for the purpose of obtaining practical experience as a requirement for licensure as a pharmacist; § C. a qualified applicant awaiting examination for licensure; or § D. a participant in a residency or fellowship program, not licensed to practice pharmacy in the state of Minnesota, who is a licensed pharmacist in another state or who is a graduate of the University of Minnesota College of Pharmacy or another pharmacy college approved by the board. 6800.5400 TRAINING. § Subp. 5. Competencies. Upon registration, interns and preceptors will be furnished a copy of the board's internship manual, which lists the minimum competencies that should be the focus of internship training. The competencies are furnished to suggest appropriate types and order of training experience and shall be used to ensure that the intern's practical experiences are commensurate with the intern's educational level, and broad in scope. § Subp. 6. Evidence of completion. Applicants for licensure as pharmacists who are examined and licensed after September 17, 1973, shall submit evidence that they have successfully completed not less than 1,500 hours of internship under the instruction and supervision of a preceptor. Effective May 1, 2003, candidates for licensure shall submit evidence that they have successfully completed not less than 1,600 hours of internship under the direction and supervision of a preceptor. Credit for internship shall be granted only to registered interns who have completed the third year of the five-year or six-year pharmacy curriculum, provided, however, that: § A. no more than 400 hours of concurrent time internship will be granted to an intern; and § B. 800 hours of internship credit may be acquired through experiential education program experiences that do not have as their focus traditional compounding, dispensing, and related patient counseling activities. The remaining 800 hours of the 1,600 hour total requirement must focus on traditional compounding, dispensing, and related patient counseling activities.